North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 14C. Marine Resources Fund and Marine Resources Endowment Fund.

§ 113-175.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 2.2, effective January 1, 2006.

(1a)

“Endowment Fund” means the North Carolina Marine Resources Endowment Fund.

(1b)

“Endowment investment income” means interest and other income earned from the investment of the principal of the Endowment Fund.

(1c)

“Endowment license revenues” means the net proceeds from the sale of licenses issued under G.S. 113-174.2(c)(6) and a portion of the net proceeds from the sale of licenses issued under G.S. 113-351(c)(3) and (4). The apportionment of the net proceeds from the sale of licenses issued under G.S. 113-351(c)(3) and (4) shall be jointly determined by the Division of Marine Fisheries and the Wildlife Resources Commission. In the event that the Division of Marine Fisheries and the Wildlife Resources Commission cannot agree on the apportionment, the Governor is authorized to determine the apportionment.

“Marine Resources Fund” means the North Carolina Marine Resources Fund.

“Marine resources investment income” means interest earned from the investment of the principal of the Marine Resources Fund.

“Marine resources license revenues” means the net proceeds from the sale of licenses issued under Article 14B of this Chapter and a portion of the net proceeds from the sale of licenses issued under Article 25A of this Chapter, excluding endowment license revenues. The apportionment of the net proceeds from the sale of licenses issued under Article 25A of this Chapter shall be jointly determined by the Division of Marine Fisheries and the Wildlife Resources Commission. In the event that the Division of Marine Fisheries and the Wildlife Resources Commission cannot agree on the apportionment, the Governor is authorized to determine the apportionment.

History.

2004-187, s. 1; 2005-455, s. 2.2.

§ 113-175.1.
North Carolina Marine Resources Fund.

There is hereby established the North Carolina Marine Resources Fund as a nonreverting special revenue fund in the office of the State Treasurer. The purpose of the Marine Resources Fund is to enhance the marine resources of the State. The principal of the Marine Resources Fund shall consist of:

Marine resources license revenues.

Proceeds of any gifts, grants, and contributions to the State that are specifically designated for inclusion in the Marine Resources Fund.

Funds realized from the sale, lease, rental, or other grant of rights to real or personal property acquired or produced from funds disbursed from the Marine Resources Fund.

Federal aid project reimbursements to the extent that funds disbursed from the Marine Resources Fund originally funded the project for which the reimbursement is made.

The State Treasurer shall hold the Marine Resources Fund separate and apart from all other moneys, funds, and accounts. The State Treasurer shall invest the assets of the Marine Resources Fund in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

, and all marine resources investment income shall be deposited to the credit of the Marine Resources Fund. The State Treasurer shall disburse the principal of the Marine Resources Fund and marine resources investment income only upon the written direction of the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental Quality.

The Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental Quality may authorize the disbursement of the principal of the Marine Resources Fund and marine resources investment income only to manage, protect, restore, develop, cultivate, conserve, and enhance the marine resources of the State. The Division of Marine Fisheries may not authorize the disbursement of the principal of the Marine Resources Fund and marine resources investment income to establish positions without specific authorization from the General Assembly. Prior to authorizing disbursements from the Marine Resources Fund, the Division of Marine Fisheries shall consult with the Wildlife Resources Commission about these proposals. Expenditure of the assets of the Marine Resources Fund shall be made through the State budget accounts of the Division of Marine Fisheries in accordance with the provisions of the Executive Budget Act. The Marine Resources Fund is subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

To enhance fishing opportunities, the Marine Resources Fund may be used to construct artificial reefs in the estuarine and ocean waters of the State and federal waters up to 20 nautical miles from land.

History.

2004-187, s. 1; 2005-455, s. 2.3; 2011-145, s. 13.18; 2013-360, s. 14.9(a), (b); 2017-57, ss. 13.15(c), 13.16.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-455, s. 2.3, effective January 1, 2006, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.18, effective July 1, 2011, added the second sentence in subsection (c).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.9(a), (b), effective July 1, 2013,
in subsection (b), deleted “both” preceding “the Marine Fisheries” and “and the Wildlife Resources Commission” from the end; and in subsection (c), deleted “and the Wildlife Resources Commission” following “Fisheries Commission” throughout, added the fifth sentence, and made a stylistic change.

Session Laws 2017-57, ss. 13.15(c) and 13.16, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental Quality” for “both the Marine Fisheries Commission” in subsection (b); rewrote subsection (c); and added subsection (d).

§§ 113-175.2 through 113-175.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, ss. 2.4 through 2.6, effective January 1, 2006.

§ 113-175.5.
North Carolina Marine Resources Endowment Fund.

There is hereby established the North Carolina Marine Resources Endowment Fund as a nonreverting special revenue fund in the office of the State Treasurer. The purpose of the Endowment Fund is to provide the citizens and residents of the State with the opportunity to invest in the future of the marine resources of the State. The principal of the Endowment Fund shall consist of:

Endowment license revenues.

Proceeds of any gifts, grants, or contributions to the State that are specifically designated for inclusion in the Endowment Fund.

Proceeds of any gifts, grants, or contributions to the Marine Fisheries Commission or the Division of Marine Fisheries that are not specifically designated for another purpose.

Funds realized from the sale, lease, rental, or other grant of rights to real or personal property acquired or produced from endowment investment income.

Federal aid project reimbursements to the extent that endowment investment income originally funded the project for which the reimbursement is made.

Transfers to the Endowment Fund.

Any endowment investment income or marine resources license revenue that is credited to the Endowment Fund for the purpose of increasing the principal of the Endowment Fund.

The State Treasurer shall hold the Endowment Fund separate and apart from all other moneys, funds, and accounts. The State Treasurer shall invest the assets of the Endowment Fund in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

. The State Treasurer shall disburse the endowment investment income only upon the written direction of the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental Quality.

Subject to the limitations set out in subsection (d) of this section, the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental Quality may authorize the disbursement of endowment investment income only to manage, protect, restore, develop, cultivate, conserve, and enhance the marine resources of the State. The Division of Marine Fisheries may not authorize the disbursement of endowment investment income to establish positions without specific authorization from the General Assembly. Prior to authorizing disbursements from the Marine Resources Endowment Fund, the Division of Marine Fisheries shall consult with the Wildlife Resources Commission about funding requests.

The Endowment Fund is declared to constitute a special trust derived from a contractual relationship between the State and the members of the public whose investments contribute to the Endowment Fund. In recognition of this special trust, all of the following limitations are placed on disbursement of funds held in the Endowment Fund:

Any restrictions specified by the donors on the uses of income derived from gifts, grants, and voluntary contributions shall be respected but shall not be binding.

No disbursements of the endowment investment income derived from the endowment license revenues generated by the sale of Infant Lifetime CRFLs under G.S. 113-174.2(c)(6)e., Youth Lifetime CRFLs under G.S. 113-174.2(c)(6)f., Infant Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing Licenses under G.S. 113-351(c)(3)a., or Youth Lifetime Unified Sportsman/Coastal Recreational Fishing Licenses under G.S. 113-351(c)(3)b. shall be made for any purpose until the respective licensees attain the age of 16 years. The State Treasurer shall periodically make an actuarial determination as to the amount of endowment investment income within the Endowment Fund that remains encumbered by the restriction of this subdivision and the amount that is free of the restriction. The Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission shall provide the State Treasurer with the information necessary to make this determination.

No disbursement shall be made from the principal of the Endowment Fund except as otherwise provided by law.

Expenditure of the endowment investment income shall be made through the State budget accounts of the Division of Marine Fisheries in accordance with the provisions of the Executive Budget Act. The Endowment Fund is subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

History.

2005-455, s. 2.7; 2013-360, s. 14.9(c), (d); 2017-57, s. 13.15(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.9(c), (d), effective July 1, 2013, deleted “and the Wildlife Resources Commission” from the end of subsection (b), ; and, in subsection (c), deleted “and the Wildlife Resources Commission” following “Fisheries Commission” throughout, and added the last sentence.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 13.15(d), effective July 1, 2017, substituted “the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental Quality” for “ both the Marine Fisheries Commission” in subsection (b); and rewrote subsection (c).

§ 113-175.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.12.(a), effective October 22, 2015.

History.

2005-455, s. 2.7; 2011-291, s. 2.26; repealed by 2015-286, s. 4.12(a), effective October 22, 2015.

§§ 113-176 through 113-180.

Reserved for future codification purposes.